Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4914.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2010. (1) A firm may engage in the practice of architecture, the practice of professional engineering, or the practice of professional surveying in this state, if not less than 2/3 51% of the principals of the firm are licensees. (2) However, a nonlicensed principal and the principal's firm shall apply for and receive an approval from the department to engage in the practice of architecture, the practice of professional engineering, or the practice of professional surveying, if the conduct of the firm and its the principals of the firm comply with rules promulgated by the department. (3) Upon On request by the department, a firm shall report to the department the names and addresses of its the principals of the firm, persons in responsible charge, unlicensed principals, and any other information the department considers necessary. (4) A firm shall employ a person in responsible charge in the field of services offered at each place of business in this state where services are offered by the firm, except at a field office which that provides only a review of construction.